Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-762
Sections; supplementary to existing law.

Sections 31-727 to 31-762 are supplementary to existing statutes and confer upon sanitary and improvement districts powers not heretofore granted and sections 31-727 to 31-762 shall not be construed as repealing or amending any existing statute.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 36, p. 211.